Washington statutes.
RCW 10.98.080

State identification number, furnishing of.

The section shall promptly furnish a state identification number to the originating agency and to the prosecuting attorney who received a copy of the arrest and fingerprint form. In the case of juvenile felony-like adjudications, the section shall furnish, upon request, the state identification number to the juvenile information section of the administrative office of the courts.

[ 2005 c 282 s 23; 1985 c 201 s 3; 1984 c 17 s 8.]